Maryland, session 2026, SB0926.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–2501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(l) “Exempt material” means a material, or any portion of a material, that is:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0926*

SENATE BILL 926
(4) Packaging for a product regulated as a drug, DIETARY SUPPLEMENT,
or medical device by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, including associated
components and consumable medical equipment;
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.